District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1017

Enforcement.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 18, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3417.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.
Delegation of Authority Under the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 and the Litter Control Administration Act of 1985, see Mayor’s Order 2008-157, November 20, 2008 ( 55 DCR 12539).